src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUM_36KOKR_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_36KOKR_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_46SWBWR
!! sõbõr:sõbõr
!! * Yaml: **N-swbwr36**
!! derived from 36särǵ
!        NUM_46SWBWR-SG ;
!        NUM_46SWBWR_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_46SWBWR-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_46SWBWR-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_46SWBWR_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_46SWBWR_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_37PINI !!= @CODE@ pini:pini
!        NUM_37PINI-SG ;
!        NUM_37PINI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_37PINI-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_37WLI/PINI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_37PINI_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_37WLI/PINI_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_37WLI !!= @CODE@ õli:õli
!        NUM_37WLI-SG ;
!        NUM_37WLI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_37WLI-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_37WLI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_37WLI_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_37WLI_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38PUNG
! NUM_38PUNG-SG ;
! NUM_38PUNG_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PUNG-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_38PUNG-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PUNG_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_38PUNG_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38PULL1
! NUM_38PULL1-SG ;
! NUM_38PULL1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PULL1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PULL1_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38PAPP1
! NUM_38PAPP1-SG ;
! NUM_38PAPP1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PAPP1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_38PAPP1/REHK1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PAPP1_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_38PAPP1/REHK1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38REHK1
! NUM_38REHK1-SG ;
! NUM_38REHK1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38REHK1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_38PAPP1/REHK1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38REHK1_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_38PAPP1/REHK1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38PUUM1
! NUM_38PUUM1-SG ;
! NUM_38PUUM1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PUUM1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_38PUUM1/SUEUEK1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PUUM1_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_38PUUM1/SUEUEK1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38SUEUEK1
! NUM_38SUEUEK1-SG ;
! NUM_38SUEUEK1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38SUEUEK1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_38PUUM1/SUEUEK1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38SUEUEK1_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_38PUUM1/SUEUEK1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38HUETT !!= * @CODE@ hütt:hütt
! NUM_38HUETT-SG ;
! NUM_38HUETT_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38HUETT-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_38HUETT-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38HUETT_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_38HUETT_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38KULD
! NUM_38KULD-SG ;
! NUM_38KULD_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38KULD-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_38KULD-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38KULD_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_38KULD_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38PUTR
! NUM_38PUTR-SG ;
! NUM_38PUTR_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PUTR-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_38PUTR-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PUTR_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_38PUTR_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_39VIDO !!= * @CODE@ vido:vido
!        NUM_39VIDO-SG ;
!        NUM_39VIDO_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_39VIDO-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_39VIDO-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_39VIDO_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_39VIDO_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_39HAEBUE !!= * @CODE@ häbü:häbü
!        NUM_39HAEBUE-SG ;
!        NUM_39HAEBUE_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_39HAEBUE-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_39HAEBUE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_39HAEBUE_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_39HAEBUE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_40TALO !!= @CODE@ talo:talo
!        NUM_40TALO-SG ;
!        NUM_40TALO_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_40TALO-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_40TALO/HELUE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_40TALO_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_40TALO/HELUE_PL ;!
!
!LEXICON NUM_40HELUE !!= @CODE@ helü:helü
!        NUM_40HELUE-SG ;
!        NUM_40HELUE_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_40HELUE-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_40TALO/HELUE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_40HELUE_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_40TALO/HELUE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_40UJA !!= @CODE@ uja:uja
!        NUM_40UJA-SG ;
!        NUM_40UJA_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_40UJA-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_40UJA/IJAE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_40UJA_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_40UJA/IJAE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_41KAND !!= @CODE@ kand:kand
!! * Yaml: **aig, kand**
!        NUM_41KAND-SG ;
!        NUM_41KAND_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_41KAND-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_41KAND-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_41KAND_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_41KAND_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_41JUHT1 !!= @CODE@ juht́:juht
!! * Yaml: **juht́**
!        NUM_41JUHT1-SG ;
!	N_41JUHT1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_41JUHT1-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_41JUHT1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_41JUHT1_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_41JUHT1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_41AIG !!= @CODE@ aig:aig
!! * Yaml: **aig, aig**
!        NUM_41AIG-SG ;
!	N_41AIG_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_41AIG-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_41AIG-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_41AIG_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_41AIG_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_42VARI
!        NUM_42VARI-SG ;
!        NUM_42VARI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_42VARI-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_42VARI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_42VARI_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_42VARI_PL ;


LEXICON NUM_43KANARIK !!= @CODE@
        NUM_43KANARIK-SG ;
        NUM_43KANARIK_PL ;
LEXICON NUM_43KANARIK-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK-SG ;
LEXICON NUM_43KANARIK_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_43ELAENIK !!= @CODE@
!        NUM_43ELAENIK-SG ;
!        NUM_43ELAENIK_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_43ELAENIK-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_43ELAENIK_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_43SASLWK1 !!= @CODE@
!        NUM_43SASLWK1-SG ;
!        NUM_43SASLWK1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_43SASLWK1-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_43SASLWK1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_43SASLWK1_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_43SASLWK1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_43AASTAK !!= @CODE@
!        NUM_43AASTAK-SG ;
!        NUM_43AASTAK_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_43AASTAK-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_43AASTAK-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_43AASTAK_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_43AASTAK_PL ;



LEXICON NUM_44SWDA !!= @CODE@ sõda:sõda
        NUM_44SWDA-SG ;
	NUM_44SWDA_PL ;
LEXICON NUM_44SWDA-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_44SWDA-SG ;
LEXICON NUM_44SWDA_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_44SWDA_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_45KANA !!= @CODE@ kana:kana
!        NUM_45KANA-SG ;
!	NUM_45KANA_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_45KANA-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_45KANA/RIHAE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_45KANA_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_45KANA/RIHAE_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_46HAIN !!= @CODE@ hain:hain
!! * Yaml: **N-jalg, N-hain**
!        NUM_46HAIN-SG ;
!        NUM_46HAIN_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_46HAIN-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_46HAIN-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_46HAIN_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_46HAIN_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_46TARK !!= @CODE@ tark:tark
!! * Yaml: **N-jalg, N-tark**
!        NUM_46TARK-SG ;
!        NUM_46TARK_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_46TARK-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_46TARK-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_46TARK_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_46TARK_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_47ASI !!= @CODE@ asi:asi
!        NUM_47ASI-SG ;
!        NUM_47ASI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_47ASI-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_47ASI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_47ASI_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_47ASI_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_47KIRI !!= @CODE@ kiri:kiri
!        NUM_47KIRI-SG ;
!        NUM_47KIRI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_47KIRI-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_47KIRI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_47KIRI_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_47KIRI_PL ;

!! vro-digits


LEXICON yeartagpl
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Nom:    # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Gen:    # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Acc:    # ;
 +Num+Sem/Year+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc:%:s # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase
 dateyearcase_nullsuff ;
 dateyearcase_fullsuff ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff
          +Sg+Nom: # ;
          +Sg+Gen: # ;
          +Sg+Acc: # ;
     +Sg+Ill+Attr: # ;
     +Sg+Loc+Attr: # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff_w_dot
          +Sg+Nom: MARKDOT ;
          +Sg+Gen: MARKDOT ;
          +Sg+Acc: MARKDOT ;
     +Sg+Ill+Attr: MARKDOT ;
     +Sg+Loc+Attr: MARKDOT ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_fullsuff
          +Sg+Ade:%-ndal  #      ; !vowel harmony required
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ade:ndal    #      ; !Vowel harmony
          +Pl+Ade:%-ndil  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Ade:ndil    #      ;
          +Pl+Ela:%-ndist  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Ela:ndist    #      ;
          +Pl+Gen:%-ndide  #      ; !vowel harmony required
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Gen:ndide    #      ; !vowel harmony required
          +Pl+Gen:%-ndidõ  #      ; !vowel harmony required
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Gen:ndidõ    #      ; !vowel harmony required

      +Cmp/SplitR:∑-   ENDLEX ;
      +Cmp/SplitR:∑–   ENDLEX ;


LEXICON ARABICCASES   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASES ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASE ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE0   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASE0 ;


LEXICON DIGITCASES   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  to distinguish between 0 and oblique
DIGITCASE0 ;
DIGITCASE ;
