src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
katśsada+Num:katśsa%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a NUM_44SWDA  "" ;
katõssasada+Num:katõssasa%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a NUM_44SWDA  "" ;
kolmsada+Num:kolmsa%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a NUM_44SWDA  "" ;
kuuśsada+Num:kuuśsa%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a NUM_44SWDA  "" ;
katsandik+Num:%{ˋØ%}#katsandi%{kg%} NUM_43KANARIK  "" ;
katõndik+Num:katõndi%{kg%} NUM_43KANARIK  "" ;
kolmandik+Num:kolmandi%{kg%} NUM_43KANARIK  "" ;
kuvvõndik+Num:kuvvõndi%{kg%} NUM_43KANARIK  "" ;
kümnendik+Num:%{ˋØ%}#kümnendi%{kg%} NUM_43KANARIK  "" ;
nelländik+Num:nelländi%{kg%} NUM_43KANARIK  "" ;
säitsmendik+Num:%{ˋØ%}#säitsmendi%{kg%} NUM_43KANARIK  "" ;
viiendik+Num:viiendi%{kg%} NUM_43KANARIK  "" ;
ütsändik+Num:%{ˋØ%}#ütsändi%{kg%} NUM_43KANARIK  "" ;
nellisada+Num:nellisa%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a NUM_44SWDA  "" ;
paaŕsada+Num:paaŕsa%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a NUM_44SWDA  "" ;
sada+Num:sada NUM_44SWDA  "" ;
säidsesada+Num:säidsesa%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a NUM_44SWDA  "" ;
viiśsada+Num:viiśsa%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a NUM_44SWDA  "" ;
ütessäsada+Num:ütessä#sa%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a NUM_44SWDA  "" ;
